dictsource/hu_rules
.group gy
        gy         J
e) gys (ú J|S
        ü) gyse J|SE
        gys        tS
     A) gys (A     tS:
        gysz       Js
     A) gysz (A    Js
     C) gyj        J
á) gyj (árg J|j
a) gyj (e J|j	For example agyjelek word
e) gyj (e J|j	For example egyjegynyi word
höl) gyj (e J|j	For example hölgyjelölt word
ü) gyj (e J|j	For example ügyjellegét word
tár) gyj (e J|j	For example tárgyjegyzék word
     A) gyj (A     J:
    ha) gyj        J:
     e) gy (jelentésű J
    _e) gy (es     J:
    _e) gy (et_    J:
    _e) gy (etlen  J:
    _e) gy (ik     J:
    _e) gy (üt     J:
     e) gyj (elentésű Jj
    lá) gy (sá     J
  gyön) gy (sor    J
_minde) gy (ik     J

    na) gysz (a    Js
    na) gy (sokára J
    na) gy (siet   J
     ú) gys (e     J|S
  seho) gy (se     J
    ho) gy (se     J
    na) gy (ság    J
    he) gy (ség    J
     e) gys (ég    J|S
     e) gy (sarkú  J
     e) gy (sejtű  J
     e) gy (sínű   J
     e) gy (sor    J
    né) gy (sor    J
     e) gy (es-egyedül J     //need one J phoneme with this word, not J: phoneme
     ú) gy (sem    J
    né) gy (sarok  J
    na) gy (stíl   J
    fa) gy (sérül  J
    _e) gy (ezmény J:
 _mege) gy (ez     J:
     e) gy (-egy   J:
    na) gy (stratégia J
     e) gy (értelmű J:
     e) gy (ezked  J:
     e) gy (eztet  J:
     e) gy (etért  J:
     e) gy (irányú J:
   kie) gy (ez     J:
 belee) gy (ez     J:
    _e) gy (ez     J:
     e) gy (általán J:
     e) gy (ensúly J:
tizene) gy (edszer J:
tizene) gy (es     J:
     ú) gy (sincs  J
     e) gy (ért    J:
     a) gy (sérül  J
     á) gy (sor    J
    né) gy (sáv    J
tizene) gy (edik   J:
     e) gy (aránt  J:
     e) gy (enrang J:
     e) gy (előre  J:
     e) gy (enként J:
    je) gy (enként J
félmege) gy (ez    J:
    _e) gy (el     J:
tizene) gy (et     J:
tizene) gy (en     J:
     e) gy (esület J:
     a) gy (sej    J
     e) gy (úttal  J:
épülete) gy (ütt   J:
    na) gy (salló  J
    _e) gy (ágy    J:
 nem-e) gy (ez     J:        // if have a "nem" word (with $combine attribute), need [J:] not [J]
     e) gy (idejű  J:
    _e) gy (idő    J:
 nem-e) gy (ütt    J:        // if have a "nem" word (with $combine attribute), need [J:] not [J]
    na) gy (sarló  J
     e) gy (azon   J:
    _e) gy (oldal  J:
    _e) gy (év     J:
    _e) gy (órá    J:
    _e) gy (se     J
    je) gy (ezte   J
    na) gy (sebes  J
    _í) gys (e     J|S
    na) gy (siker  J
huszone) gy (edik  J:
    je) gy (ért    J
harmince) gy (edik J:
  étvá) gy (javít  J
     e) gy (ember  J:
    né) gy (jegy   J
     a) gy (sebész J
   tár) gy (sorozat J
     e) gy (jegyű  J
   tár) gy (jutal  J
     e) gys (áv    J|S       //egysáv beginning words for example need spokening single J and S phoneme.
    _e) gy (ablak  J:
összee) gy (esít   J:
 nem-e) gy (ik     J:
    _e) gy (összeg J:
     e) gys (ík    J|S       // for example egysíkú word need spokening single J and S phoneme
    _e) gy (öntet  J:
   tár) gy (sor    J
    _í) gy (jár    J
 száze) gy (es     J:
huszone) gy (es    J:
    _e) gy (é_     J:
_mint-e) gy (é_    J:
    na) gy (sáp    J
_hiszeke) gy (e    J:
huszone) gy (ed    J:
huszone) gy (ez    J:
 újrae) gy (esít   J:
     e) gy (éjszak J:
_egyszere) gy (e   J:
_huszone) gy (e    J:
 száze) gy (edik   J:
 védje) gy (straté J
    na) gy (sor    J
e) gy (esít J:
ve) gy (érték J
na) gy (jelen J
védje) gy (jo J
je) gy (já J
gyön) gy (s J
á) gy (jel J
á) gy (jóg J
á) gys (a J|S
á) gys (á J|S
á) gys (e J|S
á) gys (ű J|S
á) gys (t J|S
á) gys (o J|S
á) gys (é J|S
á) gys (u J|S
á) gys (ú J|S
á) gys (ó J|S
je) gy (s J
a) gy (st J
fa) gy (s J
hú) gy (sa J
_a) gy (jár J
_na) gy (javí J
na) gy (játé J
he) gy (ér J
gyön) gy (j J	For example üveggyöngyjáték word
a) gys (ér J|S	For example agysérült, agysérv words
ü) gys (o JS	For example ügysorozat word
a) gys (or JS	For example agysorvadás word
höl) gys (o JS	For example hölgysors word
he) gys (o JS	For example hegysora word
tár) gys (o JS	For example tárgysokaság word
he) gy (en J	For example hegyenként word
gyó) gy (j J	For example gyógyjelleget word
e) gy (san J	For example egysanszos word
lé) gys (er J|S	For example légysereg word
varan) gy (s J	For example varangysárkány word
gyó) gy (s J	For example gyógysampon word
ü) gy (st J	For example ügystratégiát word
ü) gys (a J|S	For example ügysaláta word
ü) gys (i J|S	For example ügysivatagi word
ü) gy (sp J	For example ügyspecifikus word
e) gy (eztet J:
le) gy (eztete J
na) gy (sán J
na) gy (sát J
na) gy (si J
na) gy (sú J
völ) gy (s J
né) gy (já J
né) gy (je J
á) gyj (áté J|j
tár) gy (s J
he) gy (jár J
tő) gys (é J|S
e) gy (játé J
e) gy (sl J
he) gy (esí J

.group h
        h          h
        hertz      hER2ts
        hh (-L01   h
 minde) hh (ez     h
  _cse) h (ország            //special exception, the h phoneme doesn't need spokening thiws word part
  _cse) h (szlovák           //special exception, the h phoneme doesn't need spokening thiws word part
   _ju) h (kolb 
   _ju) h (sajt 
   _ju) h (tenyész 
   _ju) h (szárnyék 
   cse) h (bánya 

.group i
        i          i
     @) i (_S1     i
     @) ig (_S2    ig
     @) ihoz (_S4q ihoz

.group í
        í          i:
        íts        i:tS:
        ítsd       i:tSd
ítsz i:ts:
     t) í (zen     i
     t) í (zet     i
     v) í (zen     i
    sz) í (vatás   i
     v) í (zére    i
    sz) í (ve      i
     t) í (zes     i
     t) í (zesz    i:
    sz) í (vel     i:
    _t) í (zük     i
   _sz) í (vattak  i
   _sz) í (vattákk i
   _sz) í (vató    i
    _v) í (zi      i         // for example vízipipa, vízimentők beginning words need spokening i, not i: phoneme
    _v) í (zió     i:        //But this word an exception for prewious rule
agressz) í (v      i:
   _sz) í (nész    i
   _sz) í (néssz   i
    sz) í (vatn    i
_megsz) í (vatta   i
szabad) ítsz       its:
    sz) í (vemészt i:
  vesz) ítsz       i:ts:
progressz) í (ve   i:
    sz) í (vemel   i:
    sz) í (vere    i:
    sz) í (veré    i:
    sz) í (verő    i:
    sz) í (vevő    i:
expressz) í (v     i:
recessz) í (ve i:
v) í (zener i:
sz) í (vember i:
árv) í (zi i:
v) í (zigé i:
csapatkv) í i:
sz) í (veg i:
depressz) í (v i:
degressz) í (v i:
regressz) í (v i:
növénykv) í (z i:
v) í (zivás i:

.group j
        j          j
     @) jában (_S5q ja:bAn
     @) jának (_S5q ja:nAk
     @) jától (_S5q ja:to:l
     @) jáig (_S4q ja:ig
     @) jára (_S4q ja:R2A
     @) jával (_S5q ja:vAl
     @) jének (_S5 je:nEk
     @) jére (_S4  je:R2E
     @) jétől (_S5 je:tY:l
     @) jéig (_S4  je:ig
     @) jével (_S5 je:vEl
     _) javíts     jAvi:tS:
     _) javítsd    jAvi:tSd
        jj (L01    j         //if have a consonants after two j letter, need spokening one j letter
        jjb        jb        //need always executing this exception
        jjr        jR2       //need always executing this exception
        jj (-L01   j
kara) jzs j|Z

.group k
        k          k
        kk         k:
        kk (C      k:
        kk (-L01   k         //if next word starts with a consonant (except k, see next rule), need one k letter
        kk (-k     k:        // but except for k beginning second words, this situation need spokening longer k: phoneme
   kk-) k                    // silent after 'kk-' spokened phoneme
     _) köztársaság k'Ysta:R2SASa:g
     _) köztársaságg k'Ysta:R2SASa:g:
        központ    kYspont
        központt   kYspont:
        központj   kYsponc
központjárat kYspontja:R2At
     _) köz        kYz
        község     kYSSe:g
        készséggy ke:SSe:g|J
        készség    ke:SSe:g
        kossuth    koSu:t
        kossutht   koSu:t:
        kossuthj   koSu:c:
        készségg   ke:SSe:g:
        kkb        kb        //need keep this exception because have some words ben or ban suffixes
        kk (L01    k
        kkj        kj        //need keep this exception because have some words jének or jának suffixes
        kkr        kR2       //special exception with always need executing
     _) közt       kYst
        k (-k      k:        // for example marok-körző word need cut one k letter and need spokening k: phoneme only
    k-) k                    //silent with second k phoneme
 _játé) kk (liens  k:        //exceptiof for kk (L01 rule
községg kYS:e:g:
gyerme) kk (L01 k:
gyere) kk (L01 k:

.group l
        l          l
    fe) l (ju      l
    fe) l (jö      l
    fe) l (jegy    l
    fe) l (jelen   l
    fe) l (jár     l
        lj         l^j
    cé) l (já      jj

        ly         j
        lly        jj
     A) lj (A      l^j
     e) l (jut     l
     e) l (jus     l
    _e) lj (ö      lj
     á) ll (j      j
 beszé) lj         jj
  bére) lj         jj
   fáj) l          l
 fájla) l (j       jj
 gondo) lj         jjj
    ke) lj         jj
 sajná) lj         jjj
        llj        jjj
     C) ly (_      li
 _kéth) ly         li
szamue) lly        lli
szamue) ly         lli
    mi) ll (i      l
   szé) l (jár     l
   szé) l (jegy    l
keresztü) l (j     l
     _) tú)        l         (j l:
     e) l (játsz   l
    fe) l (javít   l
    fe) l (jogosít l
   ökö) l (jog     l:
  inte) ll (ige    l
     e) ll (ipsz   l
     _) e)         lj        (ár lj
   _ta) lj (án     lj
   _fé) l (jobb    l
        ll (L01    l         // only speak one 1 if followed by a consonant
        llb        lb        //special exception with always need executing
        llr        lR2       //special exception with always need executing
        lly (-L01  j         //if have consonants after - character, need spokening one j letter with first part
        ll (-L01   l
bagate) ll (iz     l
fü) l (lyuk l
levé) l (lyuk l
nyé) l (lyuk l

.group m
        m          m
    ko) mm (uni    m
        mm (-L01   m         //if have a consonant after - character, need spokening one m letter
        mm (L01    m         //if have a consonant after two m letter, need spokening one m letter

.group n
        n          n
        n (g       n
        n (k       n
        n (p       m
        ny         n^
        nny        n^n^
        nj         n^n^
        nny (cs    n^        //special exception
        nny (L01   n^        // only speak one ny if followed by a consonant
        nnyb       n^b       //special exception with always need executing
        nnyr       n^R2      //special exception with always need executing
        nn (L01    n         // only speak one n if followed by a consonant
        nnb        nb        //special exception with always need executing
        nnr        nR2       //special exception with always need executing
   szí) n (ját     n
   szí) n (józan   n
        nyj        n^n^
     _) nem (-     nEm       // has $combine attribute in hu_list, combine with the next word
    me) nny (ország n^
  pihe) nj (_S2    n^
  főbe) n (jár     n
